Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,142
Controllable electronic record custody; rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement sections 8-1,141 to 8-1,143.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 41.